Washington statutes.
RCW 26.34.020

Financial responsibility.

Financial responsibility for any child placed pursuant to the provisions of the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children shall be determined in accordance with the provisions of Article V thereof in the first instance. However, in the event of partial or complete default of performance thereunder, the provisions of RCW 26.16.205 and 26.20.030 shall apply.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 168 s 2.]